Utah statutes.
32A-8-501.   Commission's power to grant licenses.
(1)  The commission may issue a local industry representative license to an
individual resident of Utah, Utah partnership, Utah corporation, or Utah
limited liability company who is employed by a manufacturer, supplier, or
importer, whether compensated by salary, commission, or another means, to
represent liquor products with the department, package agencies, licensees,
and permittees under this title including:
(a)  wine;
(b)  heavy beer; or
(c)  on or after October 1, 2008, a flavored malt beverage.
(2) (a)  Before a person described in Subsection (1) may represent an
alcoholic product of a manufacturer, supplier, or importer, the person shall
obtain a local industry representative license from the commission as provided
in this part.
(b)  A violation of this Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor.
(3)  An individual employee or agent of a local industry representative
licensee is not required to be separately licensed.
(4)  A local industry representative may represent more than one manufacturer,
supplier, or importer at a time.
(5) (a)  A manufacturer, supplier, or importer is not required to use a local
industry representative to represent its products with the department, package
agencies, licensees, or permittees.
(b)  An employee or agent of the manufacturer, supplier, or importer who is
not a local industry representative while in the state shall first register
with the department, on forms provided by the department, before representing
alcoholic beverage products with the department, package agencies, licensees,
and permittees of the department.
(c)  A manufacturer, supplier, or importer described in Subsection (5)(b) and
its employees and agents are subject to the same operational restrictions of
this part and Chapter 12, Criminal Offenses.
